Louisiana, session 2026, HB466.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:2759 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2759. West Feliciana Parish; rebate of ad valorem taxes
A. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the West Feliciana Parish
Government, West Feliciana Parish School Board, and West Feliciana Parish Law
Enforcement District may implement a rebate program through which taxpayers may
be awarded a rebate of certain amounts of ad valorem taxes paid by property owners.
The rebate program shall be subject to the conditions and requirements provided in
this Section.
B. The rebate provided for in this Section may only be granted in the form
of a credit against a subsequent year's ad valorem tax liability, expressed as a
percentage of the tax liability, but only against taxes levied by the West Feliciana
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 466 ENROLLED
Parish Government, West Feliciana Parish School Board, and West Feliciana Parish
Law Enforcement District.
C.(1) The president of West Feliciana Parish Government, the president of
the West Feliciana Parish School Board, and the sheriff of West Feliciana Parish
shall meet to determine the rebate, if any, to be issued.
(2) The meeting shall be called by the parish president, held at the parish
council chambers on or before June thirtieth of each year, and conducted in
accordance with the Open Meetings Law, with the parish president serving as the
presiding officer.
(3) The percentage rebate shall only become effective upon the unanimous
vote of the president of West Feliciana Parish Government, the president of the West
Feliciana Parish School Board, and the sheriff of West Feliciana Parish at the
meeting.
(4) The sheriff of West Feliciana Parish shall apply the percentage rebate
approved, if any, on the final ad valorem tax bill for each property prior to issuing
those bills.
Section 2. The first tax year in which rebates may be issued pursuant to the
provisions of this Act shall be the tax year beginning on January 1, 2027.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.